New York, session 2025-2026, A4693.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 30 of subsection (i) of section 3216 of the 2 insurance law, as amended by section 5 of subpart A of part BB of chap- 3 ter 57 of the laws of 2019, is amended by adding a new subparagraph (H) 4 to read as follows: 5 (H) Coverage provided under this paragraph for detoxification, shall 6 be at a minimum, seven days. Rehabilitation services shall be, at a 7 minimum, thirty days. 8 § 2. Paragraph 31 of subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance 9 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (K) to read as follows: 10 (K) Coverage provided under this paragraph for detoxification, shall 11 be at a minimum, seven days. Rehabilitation services shall be, at a 12 minimum, thirty days. 13 § 3. Paragraph 6 of subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance 14 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (H) to read as follows: 15 (H) Coverage provided under this paragraph for detoxification, shall 16 be at a minimum, seven days. Rehabilitation services shall be, at a 17 minimum, thirty days. 18 § 4. Paragraph 7 of subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance 19 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (K) to read as follows: 20 (K) Coverage provided under this paragraph for detoxification, shall 21 be at a minimum, seven days. Rehabilitation services shall be, at a 22 minimum, thirty days. 23 § 5. Subsection (k) of section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by 24 adding a new paragraph 8 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07530-01-5 A. 4693 2 1 (8) Coverage provided under this subsection for detoxification, shall 2 be at a minimum, seven days. Rehabilitation services shall be, at a 3 minimum, thirty days. 4 § 6. Subsection (l) of section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by 5 adding a new paragraph 11 to read as follows: 6 (11) Coverage provided under this subsection for detoxification, shall 7 be at a minimum, seven days. Rehabilitation services shall be, at a 8 minimum, thirty days. 9 § 7. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law.